Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-7460
Order to cease distribution.

(1) If the department finds there is a reasonable probability that (a) a wholesale drug distributor has falsified a pedigree or has sold, distributed, transferred, manufactured, repackaged, handled, or held a counterfeit prescription drug intended for human use and (b) such drug could cause serious, adverse health consequences or death, the department shall issue an order to immediately cease distribution of such drug.

(2) Persons subjected to any order issued by the department under this section shall be provided with notice and an opportunity for an informal hearing to be held not later than ten days after the date the order was issued. If the department determines, after such hearing, that inadequate grounds exist to support the actions required by the order, the department shall vacate the order.

Laws 2006, LB 994, § 34.